Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 2 Jurisdiction

29-11-10.
Determination of connection with state.

In determining under Code Section 29-11-12 and subsection (e) of Code Section 29-11-20 whether a respondent has a significant connection with a particular state, the court shall consider:

The location of the respondent’s family and other persons required to be notified of the guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding;

The length of time the respondent at any time was physically present in the state and the duration of any absence;

The location of the respondent’s property;

The extent to which the respondent has ties to the state such as voting registration, state or local tax return filing, vehicle registration, driver’s license, social relationship, and receipt of services; and

The extent to which the respondent considers or, in the absence of an impairment of mental faculties, would consider himself or herself to have a significant connection with the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-11.
Exclusive jurisdiction for appointment.

This article provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of this state to appoint a guardian or issue a conservatorship order for an adult.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-12.
Requirements for jurisdiction.

A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a conservatorship order for a respondent if:

This state is the respondent’s home state;

On the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state and:

The respondent does not have a home state or a court of the respondent’s home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is a more appropriate forum; or

The respondent has a home state, a petition for an appointment or order is not pending in a court of that state or another significant-connection state, and, before the court makes the appointment or issues the order:

A petition for an appointment or order is not filed in the respondent’s home state;

An objection to the court’s jurisdiction is not filed by a person required to be notified of the proceeding; and

The court in this state concludes that it is an appropriate forum under the factors set forth in Code Section 29-11-15;

This state does not have jurisdiction under either paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code section, the respondent’s home state and all significant-connection states have declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is the more appropriate forum, and jurisdiction in this state is consistent with the Constitutions of this state and the United States; or

The requirements for special jurisdiction under Code Section 29-11-13 are met.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-13.
Special jurisdiction; emergency appointment of guardian.

A court of this state lacking jurisdiction under paragraphs (1) through (3) of Code Section 29-11-12 has special jurisdiction to do any of the following:

Appoint a guardian in an emergency for a term not exceeding 90 days for a respondent who is physically present in this state;

Issue a conservatorship order with respect to real or tangible personal property located in this state; or

Appoint a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person or protected person for whom a provisional order to transfer the proceeding from another state has been issued under procedures similar to Code Section 29-11-20.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent’s home state on the date the petition was filed, the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-14.
Special jurisdiction; emergency appointment of guardian.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 29-11-13, a court that has appointed a guardian or issued a conservatorship order consistent with this chapter shall have exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is terminated by the court or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-15.
Declining exercise of jurisdiction; factors for determining jurisdiction.

A court of this state having jurisdiction under Code Section 29-11-12 to appoint a guardian or conservator may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it determines at any time that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum.

If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction under subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall either dismiss or stay the proceeding. The court may impose any condition the court considers just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a conservatorship order be filed promptly in another state.

In determining whether it is an appropriate forum, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

Any expressed preference of the respondent;

Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the respondent has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the respondent from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

The length of time the respondent was physically present in or was a legal resident of this or another state;

The distance of the respondent from the court in each state;

The financial circumstances of the respondent’s estate;

The nature and location of the evidence;

The ability of the court in each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence;

The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the proceeding; and

If an appointment were made, the court’s ability to monitor the conduct of the guardian or conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-16.
Unjustifiable conduct leading to jurisdiction.

If at any time a court of this state determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a conservatorship order because of unjustifiable conduct, the court may:

Decline to exercise jurisdiction;

Exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of fashioning an appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the respondent or the protection of the respondent’s property or prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a conservatorship order is filed in a court of another state having jurisdiction; or

Continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering:

The extent to which the respondent and all persons required to be notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the exercise of the court’s jurisdiction;

Whether it is a more appropriate forum than the court of any other state under the factors set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 29-11-15; and

Whether the court of any other state would have jurisdiction under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of Code Section 29-11-12.

If a court of this state determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a conservatorship order because a party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction engaged in unjustifiable conduct, it may assess against that party necessary and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, investigative fees, court costs, communication expenses, witness fees and expenses, and travel expenses. The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses of any kind against this state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-17.
Notice required; process for service.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a conservatorship order is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent’s home state on the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of this state, notice of the petition must be given to those persons that would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were brought in the respondent’s home state. The notice must be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in this state.

If compliance with the notice requirements under subsection (a) of this Code section would require personal service on any person outside this state, a court of competent jurisdiction in this state may order that such person be served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, in the manner provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 29-9-4, or by a special process server, if the petitioner so requests in the petition or on the court’s own motion.

If compliance with the notice requirements under subsection (a) of this Code section would require service on any person outside this state that is not sui juris, such person shall be served in a manner provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 29-9-4.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-18.
Multiple court jurisdictional rules.

Except for a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency or issuance of a conservatorship order limited to property located in this state under paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-13, if a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a conservatorship order is filed in this state and in another state and neither petition has been dismissed or withdrawn, the following rules shall apply:

If the court in this state has jurisdiction under Code Section 29-11-12, it may proceed with the case unless a court in another state acquires jurisdiction under provisions similar to Code Section 29-11-12 before the appointment or issuance of the order; and

If the court in this state does not have jurisdiction under Code Section 29-11-12, whether at the time the petition is filed or at any time before the appointment or issuance of the order, the court shall stay the proceeding and communicate with the court in the other state. If the court in the other state has jurisdiction, the court in this state shall dismiss the petition unless the court in the other state determines that the court in this state is a more appropriate forum.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.